Maine, session 132, LD152.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §408-A, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 662, §5, is amended to
read:
Except as otherwise provided by statute, a person has the right to inspect and copy any
public record in accordance with this section within a reasonable time of making 30 days
after the date on which the request to inspect or copy the public record is made.
Sec. 2. 1 MRSA §408-A, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 155, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Acknowledgment; clarification; time estimate; cost estimate. The agency or
official having custody or control of a public record shall acknowledge receipt of a request
made according to this section within 5 working days of receiving the request and may
request clarification concerning which public record or public records are being requested.
Within a reasonable time of receiving the request, the agency or official shall provide a
good faith, nonbinding estimate of the time frame within which the agency or official will
comply with the request and a cost estimate as provided in subsection 9. The agency or
official shall make a good faith effort to fully respond to the request within the estimated
time frame but must fully respond within 30 days after the date on which the request was
made. For purposes of this subsection, the date a request is received is the date a sufficient
description of the public record is received by the agency or official at the office responsible
for maintaining the public record. An agency or official that receives a request for a public
record that is maintained by that agency but is not maintained by the office that received
the request shall forward the request to the office of the agency or official that maintains
the record, without willful delay, and shall notify the requester that the request has been
forwarded and that the office to which the request has been forwarded will acknowledge
receipt within 5 working days of receiving the request.